Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 12
RAIL DISTRICT ACT

Section

32-12-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Rail District Act of 1982".

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 503, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-102. Legislative declaration.

Any loss of railroad service within certain regions of Colorado may seriously interfere with the flow of commerce within this state, and the general assembly hereby declares that the following measures are adopted to allow for the formation of rail districts permitting local participation in the ownership of certain railroad properties and in the conduct of providing railroad services, subject to the limitations contained in this article.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 503, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 12, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the board of directors of a rail district.

"Chairman" means the chairman of the board.

"County" means a home rule or statutory county and includes a city and county.

(3.5) "Eligible elector" or "elector" of a rail district means an individual qualified pursuant to section 32-1-103 (5).

"Municipality" means a home rule or statutory city or town, a territorial charter city, or a city and county.

"Population" means the population as estimated by the organizational commission or secretary of state, based upon census tract data or other officially compiled data.

"Publication" means printing, once a week for three consecutive weeks, by three publications in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the rail district or proposed rail district if there is such a newspaper and, if not, then in a newspaper in the county in which the rail district or proposed rail district is located. It is not necessary that publication be made on the same day of the week in each of the three weeks, but not less than twelve days, excluding the day of the first publication but including the day of the last publication, shall intervene between the first publication and the last publication, and publication shall be complete on the date of the last publication.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 918, § 183, effective January 1, 1993.)

"Rail district" means a special district which may acquire and operate railroad facilities subject to the following:

Any such purchase of railroad facilities shall be:

From a railroad which is subject to the jurisdiction of a federal bankruptcy court pursuant to federal bankruptcy laws; or

From a railroad that has been granted the right to abandon such railroad facilities by the federal surface transportation board; and

Limited to a railroad facility which has been in operation within the five years prior to such purchase by a rail district.

Upon acquisition, any such railroad facility shall be operated to haul freight or passengers or both.

No rail district may be formed containing any area of the regional transportation district, created by article 9 of this title.

"Railroad facilities" or "facilities" means all property either real, personal, or mixed which is used or useful in the conduct of railroad services.

"Rates, fees, tolls, or charges" shall apply only to rates, fees, tolls, or charges required by a rail district and shall not apply to rates, fees, tolls, or charges which are prescribed by federal or other state laws or regulations and which are subject to the jurisdiction of federal or other state agencies.

"Regular special district election" means the election held on the Tuesday succeeding the first Monday of May in every odd-numbered year, as provided in section 32-1-103 (17), for the purpose of electing members of the board and for submission of other public questions, if any.

"Secretary" means the secretary of the board.

"Service" means a function or service which a rail district is authorized to provide in accordance with this article.

"Special election" means any election called by the board for submission of public questions, which election shall be held on a Tuesday other than a regular election day.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 503, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 92:

(3.5) added and (7), (11), and (14) amended, p. 918, § 183, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2001:

(8)(a)(II) amended, p. 1276, § 43, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

IP and (11) amended, (HB 18-1039), ch. 29, p. 331, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

32-12-104. Territorial requirements for rail districts.

A rail district may include any or all of the territory of one or more counties, as may be proposed, if each county has some contiguity with another county within the rail district or proposed rail district.

The boundaries of any rail district shall not be such as to create any enclave.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 505, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-105. Petition for formation.

The formation of a rail district shall be initiated by a petition signed by eligible electors of the proposed rail district in number not less than five percent of the votes cast in the proposed rail district for all candidates for the office of secretary of state at the last preceding general election. The petition shall be filed with the district court of the county which has the largest population within the proposed rail district and a copy thereof delivered to the organizational commission upon its appointment by the court. In addition, a copy thereof shall also be filed with the division of local government in the department of local affairs.

The petition shall state the name proposed for the rail district, shall contain a description of the territory to be included within the boundaries of such rail district, shall list the counties and municipalities or portions thereof to be included within the rail district, and shall also state the proposed rail facilities to be acquired and operated.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall fix a time for a hearing, which shall be not less than twenty nor more than forty days after the petition is filed. At least seven days prior to the hearing date, the clerk of the court shall give notice by publication of the pendency of the petition and of the time and place of the hearing. At the hearing, the court shall determine whether the requisite number of eligible electors has signed the petition. No petition with the requisite signatures shall be declared void on account of minor defects, and the court may at any time permit the petition to be amended to correct any defects.

If it appears at the conclusion of the hearings that the petition conforms with the requirements of this article, the court, by order entered of record, shall appoint a rail district organizational commission according to the procedures required under section 32-12-106.

At the time of filing the petition or at any time subsequent thereto, and prior to the time of hearing on said petition, a bond shall be filed, with security approved by the court, or a cash deposit made sufficient to pay all expenses connected with the proceedings in case the organization of the rail district is not effected. If at any time during the proceeding the court is satisfied that the bond first executed or the amount of cash deposited is insufficient in amount, it may require the execution of an additional bond or the deposit of additional cash within a time to be fixed, not less than ten days distant, and, upon failure of the petitioner to execute or deposit the same, the petition shall be dismissed.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 505, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 92:

(1) and (2)(b) amended, p. 919, § 184, effective January 1, 1993.

32-12-106. Court appoints organizational commission and election committee.

The court shall appoint an odd number of at least five rail district organizational commission members selected from the membership of the governing bodies of the counties and municipalities having territory within the boundaries of the proposed rail district, subject to the following limitation: If the proposed rail district is comprised of more than one county or portion thereof, no more than a majority of the members of the organizational commission shall be residents of any one county or any one municipality, and at least one member shall be appointed from every county situated wholly or partially within the boundaries of the proposed rail district. If the proposed rail district is within the boundaries of only one county and includes one or more municipalities, at least two members shall be residents of one or more municipalities within the county.

At the hearing specified in section 32-12-105 (2)(b), the court shall appoint the county clerk and recorder of each county located wholly or partially within the boundaries of the proposed rail district as members of an election committee to administer the election provided for in the formation of such rail district and shall within seven days of such appointment notify said county clerk and recorders of their appointments.

A majority of the county clerk and recorders shall constitute a quorum. A chairman shall be elected by the county clerk and recorders at their first meeting, who may call additional meetings as necessary to accomplish the purposes of the election committee.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 505, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-107. Rail district organizational commission.

The rail district organizational commission appointed pursuant to section 32-12-106 shall meet within twenty days after its appointment on a date designated by the district court. The rail district organizational commission shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from among its membership. Further meetings of the commission shall be held upon call of the chairman or a majority of the members of the commission. All meetings shall be open to the public. A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum. The commission may adopt other such rules for its operations and proceedings as it deems necessary or desirable. Members of the commission shall receive no compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred during the performance of their official duties as organizational costs. Such organizational costs may be paid from the bond or cash deposit provided in section 32-12-105 (4) if the organization is not effected or by the rail district if the organization is effected.

The rail district organizational commission shall determine which rail facilities are to be acquired and rehabilitated and what rail services are to be provided, together with the maximum ad valorem tax mill levy, if any, necessary to support the acquisition and rehabilitation by the proposed rail district upon its formation, subject to the approval of the eligible electors as provided in this article.

The rail district organizational commission shall determine the manner in which the railroad facility acquisitions and services are to be submitted for consideration by the eligible electors at the formation election to be called by the district court, as provided in section 32-12-108. Prior to the submission of the report to the district court, pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section, the commission shall conduct a public hearing and cause notice to be published, stating the time and place of the public hearing, and shall apprise the general public of its right to attend the hearing and make comments regarding the proposals to be placed on the ballot.

Within ninety days after its initial meeting, the commission shall present to the district court a report listing proposed railroad facilities to be acquired and proposed services to be considered by the eligible electors in each county included in the rail district. A majority vote of the members of the rail district organizational commission shall determine the proposed railroad facilities acquisitions, the proposed services, and the maximum mill levy that shall be presented to the eligible electors for their approval or rejection.

The commission report shall also divide the rail district into five zones of approximately equal population in accordance with the provisions of section 32-12-109 for the purpose of electing candidates to the board. The board shall consist of seven members, including one member from each of the five zones and two at-large members. Such zones shall be numbered consecutively starting with number one, and the terms of office shall be as specified in section 32-12-109.

The commission shall specify the date for a special election for formation of the rail district, but, if the organizational commission's report is completed not more than one hundred eighty days and not less than eighty days before the next general election, the election may be held jointly or concurrently with the next general election.

The rail district organizational commission shall be dissolved as of the day on which the election is held pursuant to section 32-12-108.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 506, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 92:

(2), (3)(a), and (3)(c) amended, p. 919, § 185, effective January 1, 1993.

32-12-108. Election for formation - acquisitions - services - mill levy limit - board.

Within seven days after receipt of the rail district organizational commission's report, the district court shall direct the election committee, as provided in section 32-12-106 (2), to conduct an election on the date designated by the organizational commission for the purpose of deciding whether a rail district is to be formed, to provide an opportunity for the eligible electors to approve the proposed railroad facilities to be acquired, the maximum mill levy, and the services proposed for the rail district, and to elect the board of directors of the rail district.

The court shall direct the election committee to publish notice of the election setting forth the list of proposed railroad facilities acquisitions, proposed services, and maximum mill levy and to conduct the election pursuant to articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 920, § 186, effective January 1, 1993.)

At the election, eligible electors shall "approve" or "disapprove" the formation of the rail district, the railroad facilities proposed to be acquired, the services proposed, and the maximum mill levy and shall elect candidates to serve on the board of directors of the rail district. The candidate receiving the highest number of votes within each zone shall be elected, and the two candidates receiving the highest number of votes within the entire rail district shall be elected members at large. In the event of tie votes for the last available vacancy for the board, the committee shall determine by lot the person who shall be elected. No rail district may be formed, no facility acquired, no service established, and no maximum mill levy established unless approved by a majority of the eligible electors voting thereon in each county, or portion thereof, within the rail district.

Within seven days following the election, the committee shall certify the results of the election to the court. If a majority of the eligible electors in each county, or portion thereof, voting thereon approve formation, the court shall declare, by order entered of record, that the rail district is formed in the corporate name designated in the petition and shall designate those railroad facilities to be acquired, the services to be provided, and the maximum mill levy which were authorized by a majority of the eligible electors voting thereon in each county, or portion thereof, at the election. Upon the filing with the court of the oath of office of members elected to the board, the court, by order entered of record, shall declare the members of the board elected and qualified, and the formation shall be complete. At that time, the election committee shall be dissolved. The board shall be charged with acquiring, rehabilitating, and operating those approved facilities in accordance with this article.

The entry of an order forming a rail district shall finally and conclusively establish its regular formation against all persons except the state of Colorado, which may commence an action in the nature of quo warranto, within thirty-five days after entry of such order, and not otherwise. The formation of the rail district shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or proceeding, except as expressly authorized in this section.

All necessary expenses for the elections and other proceedings conducted pursuant to sections 32-12-106 and 32-12-107 and this section, including the expenses and reimbursements for the organizational commission, shall be paid from the bond or cash deposit required pursuant to section 32-12-105 (4) if the organization is not effected or by the rail district if the organization is effected.

Within fifteen days after the entry of the order forming a rail district, the clerk of the court shall file a copy of the decree with the board of county commissioners and the assessor of each county, or portion thereof, within the rail district and with the division of local government.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 507, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 92:

(1) to (4) amended, p. 920, § 186, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1644, § 72, effective May 31.

L. 98:

(1)(b) amended, p. 827, § 47, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(5) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 882, § 151, effective July 1.

32-12-109. Board of directors.

The governing body of the rail district shall be a board of directors in which all legislative power of the rail district is vested. The board shall consist of seven members, five of whom shall reside in and be elected by the eligible electors of the respective zones and two of whom shall be elected at large. Of those members first elected, the terms for representatives from odd-numbered zones and the at-large member receiving the greater number of votes shall continue until their successors are elected at the second regular special district election thereafter and are qualified, and the terms for those elected from even-numbered zones and the other at-large member shall continue until their successors are elected at the first regular special district election thereafter and are qualified. Thereafter, all terms shall be for four years. Any eligible elector of the rail district who resides in the rail district shall be eligible to hold office. Notwithstanding any provision in the charter of any municipality or county to the contrary, mayors, councilmen, trustees, and county commissioners may additionally hold elective office with the rail district and be compensated as provided in this section.

At least ninety days prior to the first regular special district election after the formation of the rail district, the board may change the boundary of any board of director zone within the rail district. Thereafter, the boundaries may be changed no more frequently than every four years or after announcement of the results of a decennial census. The board shall zone only by resolution passed by a majority of the members elected to the board, and any rezoning shall be such as to provide compact zones of approximately equal population. No rezoning shall extend or shorten the term of office of any member of the board.

The board has power, by appointment, to fill all vacancies on the board, and the person so appointed shall hold office until the next regular special district election and until a successor is elected and qualified. Any person appointed to represent a zone shall reside in the zone in which the vacancy occurred. If the term of the member creating the vacancy extends beyond the next regular special district election, the election shall be for the unexpired term.

The board shall elect a chairman, vice-chairman, secretary, and such other officers as it deems necessary. The chairman and vice-chairman shall be members of the board. The board may appoint or contract for a chief administrator, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The board shall prescribe by resolution the duties of said officers pursuant to the powers granted in this article. In addition to other powers provided by resolution, the chairman shall preside over meetings of the board and shall vote as a member of the board.

The board may provide by resolution for the compensation of its members which shall be the same per diem compensation as provided in section 2-2-307, C.R.S., for members of interim legislative committees for each day a member is necessarily engaged in the business of the district, in addition to the reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by each member while so engaged. Except for the initial board, the compensation of a member shall not be increased nor diminished during his term of office.

Except as specifically provided otherwise, a majority of board members shall constitute a quorum, and a majority of the members elected to the board shall be necessary for any action taken by the board; except that a majority of a quorum may adjourn from day to day.

In addition to any acts of the board specifically required to be accomplished by resolution, any action adopting or revising a budget or establishing the administrative organization and structure shall be passed by resolution. At least six days shall elapse between introduction and final passage of a resolution. Such resolution shall not take effect and be enforced until the expiration of thirty days after final passage except resolutions calling for special elections or those necessary to the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, which shall contain the reasons making the same necessary in a separate section. All other actions of the board may be accomplished by motion.

Any board member may be recalled from office pursuant to the provisions and subject to the conditions of sections 32-1-906 and 32-1-907.

It is the duty of the board to comply with the provisions of parts 1, 5, and 6 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S. It is the further duty of the board to publish the results of its annual audit statement or report which shall be certified by the person making the audit, or by the board if unaudited, in one issue of a newspaper of general circulation in the rail district. Such publication shall be no later than thirty days following completion of the audit statement or report.

The fiscal and budget year for all rail districts organized or operating under the provisions of this article shall be from January 1 through December 31 of each year.

All special and regular meetings of the board shall be held at locations which are within the boundaries of the rail district or which are within the boundaries of any county in which the rail district is located, in whole or in part, or in any county so long as the meeting location does not exceed twenty miles from the district boundaries. The provisions of this subsection (11) may be waived only if the following criteria are met:

The proposed change of location of a meeting of the board appears on the agenda of a regular or special meeting of the board; and

A resolution is adopted by the board stating the reason for which a meeting of the board is to be held in a location other than under the provisions of this subsection (11) and further stating the date, time, and place of such meeting.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 508, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 90:

(11) added, p. 1500, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) to (3) amended, p. 921, § 187, effective January 1, 1993.

32-12-110. General powers.

The rail district shall be a body corporate and a political subdivision of the state, and the board has the following general powers:

To have and use a corporate seal;

To sue and be sued and be a party to suits, actions, and proceedings. The provisions of the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S., shall be applicable to any rail district, or employee thereof, formed under this article.

To enter into contracts and agreements affecting the affairs of the rail district and to accept all funds resulting therefrom pursuant to the provisions and limitations of part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S.;

To contract with private persons, associations, or corporations for the provision of any service related to the operations of the rail district within or without its boundaries and to accept all funds and obligations resulting therefrom;

To borrow money and incur indebtedness and other obligations and to evidence the same by certificates, notes, or debentures and to issue general obligation or revenue bonds, or any combinations thereof, in accordance with the provisions of this article;

To refund any bonded or other indebtedness or special obligations of the rail district without an election in accordance with the provisions and limitations of this article;

To acquire, dispose of, and encumber real and personal property, including, without limitation, rights and interests in property, including leases and easements, necessary to accomplish the purposes of the rail district;

To acquire, construct, equip, operate, rehabilitate, and maintain those rail facilities as authorized in section 32-12-108 to accomplish the purposes of the rail district;

To operate such acquired facility itself or subcontract such operation to a private or common carrier;

To have the management, control, and supervision of all the business affairs and properties of the rail district;

To hire and retain agents, employees, engineers, attorneys, and financial or other consultants and to provide for the powers, duties, and qualifications thereof;

To construct, establish, and maintain works and facilities in, across, or along any easement dedicated to a public use, or any public street, road, or highway, subject to the provisions of section 32-12-111, and in, upon, or over any vacant public lands, which public lands are now, or may become, the property of the state of Colorado, and to construct, establish, and maintain works and facilities in, across, or along any stream of water or watercourse; however, in the exercise of such powers, the rail district shall not displace or force the relocation of public utility facilities except by agreement between the district and the public utility;

To provide for the revenues needed to finance the rail district, subject to the limitations of this article; to fix and from time to time increase or decrease and to collect rates, fees, tolls, and other service charges pertaining to the services of the rail district, including without limitation minimum charges and charges for availability of the facilities or services relating thereto; to pledge such revenues for the payment of securities; and to enforce the collection of such revenues by civil action or by any other means authorized by law;

To adopt and amend bylaws setting forth rules of procedure for the conduct of its affairs and providing for the administrative organization and structure of the rail district, consistent with this article;

To adopt by resolution regulations not inconsistent with state law which are necessary, appropriate, or incidental to any authorized service provided by the rail district. Said regulations shall be compiled and kept by the secretary so as to be readily available for public inspection.

To appoint citizen advisory committees to assist and advise with respect to services and powers of the rail district;

To accept on behalf of the rail district gifts, grants, and conveyances upon such terms and conditions as the board may approve;

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary to or implied from the powers granted in this article.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 510, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-111. Powers to be exercised without franchise - condition.

The board has authority, without the necessity of a franchise, to cut into or excavate and use any easements dedicated to a public use or any public street, road, or highway pursuant to the construction, maintenance, or provision of services provided by the rail district.

The legislative body or other authority having jurisdiction over any such public street, road, or highway has authority to make such reasonable rules as it deems necessary in regard to any such work or use, and may require the payment of such reasonable fees by the rail district as may be fixed by said body to insure proper restoration of such streets, roads, or highways.

When any such fee is paid by the rail district, it shall be the responsibility of the legislative body or other authority to promptly restore such street, road, or highway. If such fee is not fixed or paid, the rail district shall promptly restore any such street, road, or highway to its former condition, as nearly as possible.

In the course of such construction, the rail district shall not impair the normal use of any street, road, or highway more than is reasonably necessary.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 511, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-112. Limitations.

No rail district shall purchase any real property, or any lesser interest therein, without first submitting the proposition to a vote by the eligible electors of the rail district and obtaining the approval of a majority of the electors voting on the issue. Any such election may be held separately or may be held jointly or concurrently with any other election authorized by this article.

A rail district shall have no power of eminent domain.

A rail district shall be subject to the provisions of part 3 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., to the extent such provisions are applicable.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 512, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 92:

(3) amended, p. 2180, § 47, effective June 2; (1) amended, p. 921, § 188, effective January 1, 1993.

32-12-113. Revenues of rail district - collection.

In any rail district, all rates, fees, tolls, and charges shall constitute a perpetual lien on and against the property served until paid, and any such lien may be enforced by civil action or by any other means authorized by law.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 512, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-114. Levy and collection of taxes.

To provide for the levy and collection of taxes, the board shall determine, in each year, the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation, taking into consideration other sources of revenue of the rail district, and shall fix a rate of levy not to exceed the maximum mill levy authorized pursuant to section 32-12-108 which, when levied upon all taxable property within the rail district, and together with other revenues, will raise the amount required by the rail district annually to supply funds for paying expenses of organization and the costs of constructing, operating, and maintaining the rail district, and promptly to pay in full, when due, all interest on, the principal of, and any redemption premium of bonds and other obligations of the rail district payable from taxes. The authority of the board under this section is subject to mill levy limitations provided in this article; but if the board determines that the maximum mill levy authorized under this article is insufficient to support any service of the district, the board may submit the question of an increased mill levy authorization to the eligible electors of the rail district at the next regular special district election or special election of the district, and each election shall be held at least one hundred twenty days after any preceding election of the rail district, and no more than two elections concerning an increased rail levy authorization shall be held in any year.

The board may apply a portion of such taxes and other revenues for the purpose of creating a reserve fund in such amount as the board may determine, which may be used to meet the obligations of the rail district for maintenance, operating expenses, depreciation, and improvement of the facilities of the rail district.

The board, in accordance with the schedule prescribed by section 39-5-128, C.R.S., shall certify to the board of county commissioners of each county within the rail district, or having a portion of its territory within the rail district, the rate so fixed, in order that, at the time and in the manner required by law for levying taxes, such board of county commissioners shall levy such tax upon all taxable property which is located within the rail district.

All taxes levied under this article, together with interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs of collecting same, shall constitute, until paid, a perpetual lien on and against the property, and such lien shall be on a parity with the tax lien of other general ad valorem taxes.

Property taxes provided for in this article shall be levied, assessed, collected, remitted, and accounted for in the manner provided for other general ad valorem taxes.

The board has the power to deposit or to invest surplus funds in the manner and form it determines to be most advantageous; but said deposits or investments must meet the requirements and limitations of part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. For the purpose of making such deposits, the board may appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the district. Such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires.

The board has the power to accept on behalf of the rail district all funds tendered it from the state, the federal government, or any political subdivision or agency of either, which funds are specifically intended as incentive to, or assistance in, the formation, operation, or extension of rail district activities.

No rail district shall levy a tax for the entire district for the calendar year during which it shall have been formed unless, prior to the date specified by section 39-5-128, C.R.S., for certification of the rate of levy for such year, the assessor and board of county commissioners of each county within the rail district have received from the board a map and a legal description of such rail district, and a copy of a budget of such rail district as provided by section 29-1-113, C.R.S., and increased property tax levies shall be subject to the provisions of section 29-1-301, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 512, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 90:

(8) amended, p. 1436, § 6, effective January 1, 1991.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 922, § 189, effective January 1, 1993.

32-12-115. Power to issue revenue bonds - terms.

To carry out the purposes of this article, the board is authorized to issue negotiable coupon bonds payable solely from the revenues derived, or to be derived, from the facility or combined facilities of the rail district. The terms, conditions, and details of said bonds, and the procedures related thereto shall be substantially the same as those provided in part 4 of article 35 of title 31, C.R.S., relating to water and sewer revenue bonds; except that the purposes for which the same may be issued shall not be so limited. Revenue bonds and interest coupons, if any, appurtenant thereto shall never constitute a debt or indebtedness of the rail district or any county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state within the meaning of any provision or limitation of the state constitution or statutes or any home rule charter and shall not constitute nor give rise to a pecuniary liability of any such rail district, county, municipality, or political subdivision of this state or a charge against its general credit or taxing powers. Each bond issued under this section shall recite in substance that said bond, including the interest thereon, is payable solely from the revenues pledged for the payment thereof and that said bond does not constitute a debt of the rail district within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitations or provisions. Such revenue bonds may be issued to mature at such time, not exceeding the estimated life of the facility to be acquired with the bond proceeds, as determined by the board, but in no event beyond thirty years from their respective dates.

Negotiable coupon bonds payable from revenues derived, or to be derived, from a facility or combined facilities of the rail district as authorized by subsection (1) of this section may further be secured by and be payable from tax revenues of the rail district to the same extent as general obligation bonds authorized in section 32-12-116. The form, terms, and limitations on the bonds shall be as specified in section 32-12-116. The question of the issuance of the bonds shall be submitted to and approved by the eligible electors of the rail district voting thereon, as provided by section 32-12-117.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 513, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 922, § 190, effective January 1, 1993.

32-12-116. Power to incur indebtedness - interest - maturity - denominations.

To carry out the purposes of this article, the board is authorized to issue general obligation negotiable coupon bonds of the rail district. Said bonds shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of said bonds does not exceed that maximum net effective interest rate authorized and shall be due and payable serially, either annually or semiannually, commencing not later than three years and extending not more than thirty years from the date of issuance. The form and terms of said bonds, including provisions for their payment and redemption, shall be determined by the board. If the board so determines, said bonds may be redeemable prior to maturity with or without payment of a premium, not exceeding three percent of the principal thereof. In any event, said bonds shall be subject to call not later than fifteen years from date. Said bonds shall be executed in the name and on behalf of the rail district and signed by the chairman with the seal of the rail district affixed thereto and attested by the secretary. Said bonds shall be issued in such denominations as the board determines, and the bonds and coupons, if any, thereto attached may be payable to bearer or may be in fully registered form. Interest coupons shall bear the original or facsimile signature of the chairman.

Bonds voted for different purposes by separate propositions submitted at the same or different bond elections may, at the discretion of the board, be combined and issued as a single issue of bonds so long as the security therefor is the same.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 514, § 1, effective April 23.